hunspell/mhr/mari.aff
FLAG long
SFX E6 0 емжыде/S5 [^аеоӧйь]
SFX E6 а емжыде/S5 а
SFX E6 е емжыде/S5 е
SFX E6 о емжыде/S5 о
SFX E6 ӧ емжыде/S5 ӧ
SFX E6 й емжыде/S5 й
SFX E6 ь емжыде/S5 ь
SFX E6 0 ет/S2 [^аеоӧйь]
SFX E6 а ет/S2 а
SFX E6 е ет/S2 е
SFX E6 о ет/S2 о
SFX E6 ӧ ет/S2 ӧ
SFX E6 й ет/S2 й
SFX E6 ь ет/S2 ь
SFX E6 0 ет/O1 [^аеоӧйь]
SFX E6 а ет/O1 а
SFX E6 е ет/O1 е
SFX E6 о ет/O1 о
SFX E6 ӧ ет/O1 ӧ
SFX E6 й ет/O1 й
SFX E6 ь ет/O1 ь
SFX E6 0 етше/O1 [^аеоӧйь]
SFX E6 а етше/O1 а
SFX E6 е етше/O1 е
SFX E6 о етше/O1 о
SFX E6 ӧ етше/O1 ӧ
SFX E6 й етше/O1 й
SFX E6 ь етше/O1 ь
SFX E6 0 етшак/O1 [^аеоӧйь]
SFX E6 а етшак/O1 а
SFX E6 е етшак/O1 е
SFX E6 о етшак/O1 о
SFX E6 ӧ етшак/O1 ӧ
SFX E6 й етшак/O1 й
SFX E6 ь етшак/O1 ь
SFX E6 0 етшат/O1 [^аеоӧйь]
SFX E6 а етшат/O1 а
SFX E6 е етшат/O1 е
SFX E6 о етшат/O1 о
SFX E6 ӧ етшат/O1 ӧ
SFX E6 й етшат/O1 й
SFX E6 ь етшат/O1 ь
SFX E6 0 етшыс/O1 [^аеоӧйь]
SFX E6 а етшыс/O1 а
SFX E6 е етшыс/O1 е
SFX E6 о етшыс/O1 о
SFX E6 ӧ етшыс/O1 ӧ
SFX E6 й етшыс/O1 й
SFX E6 ь етшыс/O1 ь
SFX E6 0 етын/S2 [^аеоӧйь]
SFX E6 а етын/S2 а
SFX E6 е етын/S2 е
SFX E6 о етын/S2 о
SFX E6 ӧ етын/S2 ӧ
SFX E6 й етын/S2 й
SFX E6 ь етын/S2 ь
SFX E6 0 етыным/S2 [^аеоӧйь]
SFX E6 а етыным/S2 а
SFX E6 е етыным/S2 е
SFX E6 о етыным/S2 о
SFX E6 ӧ етыным/S2 ӧ
SFX E6 й етыным/S2 й
SFX E6 ь етыным/S2 ь
SFX E6 0 етынла/S4 [^аеоӧйь]
SFX E6 а етынла/S4 а
SFX E6 е етынла/S4 е
SFX E6 о етынла/S4 о
SFX E6 ӧ етынла/S4 ӧ
SFX E6 й етынла/S4 й
SFX E6 ь етынла/S4 ь
SFX E6 0 етшын/S2 [^аеоӧйь]
SFX E6 а етшын/S2 а
SFX E6 е етшын/S2 е
SFX E6 о етшын/S2 о
SFX E6 ӧ етшын/S2 ӧ
SFX E6 й етшын/S2 й
SFX E6 ь етшын/S2 ь
SFX E6 0 етлан/S2 [^аеоӧйь]
SFX E6 а етлан/S2 а
SFX E6 е етлан/S2 е
SFX E6 о етлан/S2 о
SFX E6 ӧ етлан/S2 ӧ
SFX E6 й етлан/S2 й
SFX E6 ь етлан/S2 ь
SFX E6 0 ланет/S2 [^аеоӧь]
SFX E6 0 ланетше [^аеоӧь]
SFX E6 0 ланетшак [^аеоӧь]
SFX E6 0 ланетшат [^аеоӧь]
SFX E6 0 ланетшыс [^аеоӧь]
SFX E6 а ыланет/S2 а
SFX E6 а ыланетше а
SFX E6 а ыланетшак а
SFX E6 а ыланетшат а
SFX E6 а ыланетшыс а
SFX E6 е ыланет/S2 е
SFX E6 е ыланетше е
SFX E6 е ыланетшак е
SFX E6 е ыланетшат е
SFX E6 е ыланетшыс е
SFX E6 о ыланет/S2 о
SFX E6 о ыланетше о
SFX E6 о ыланетшак о
SFX E6 о ыланетшат о
SFX E6 о ыланетшыс о
SFX E6 ӧ ыланет/S2 ӧ
SFX E6 ӧ ыланетше ӧ
SFX E6 ӧ ыланетшак ӧ
SFX E6 ӧ ыланетшат ӧ
SFX E6 ӧ ыланетшыс ӧ
SFX E6 0 ланет/S2 [^б]ь
SFX E6 0 ланетше [^б]ь
SFX E6 0 ланетшак [^б]ь
SFX E6 0 ланетшат [^б]ь
SFX E6 0 ланетшыс [^б]ь
SFX E6 ь ланет/S2 бь
SFX E6 ь ланетше бь
SFX E6 ь ланетшак бь
SFX E6 ь ланетшат бь
SFX E6 ь ланетшыс бь
SFX E6 0 етшылан/S2 [^аеоӧйь]
SFX E6 а етшылан/S2 а
SFX E6 е етшылан/S2 е
SFX E6 о етшылан/S2 о
SFX E6 ӧ етшылан/S2 ӧ
SFX E6 й етшылан/S2 й
SFX E6 ь етшылан/S2 ь
SFX E6 0 етым/S2 [^аеоӧйь]
SFX E6 а етым/S2 а
SFX E6 е етым/S2 е
SFX E6 о етым/S2 о
SFX E6 ӧ етым/S2 ӧ
SFX E6 й етым/S2 й
SFX E6 ь етым/S2 ь
SFX E6 0 етшым/S2 [^аеоӧйь]
SFX E6 а етшым/S2 а
SFX E6 е етшым/S2 е
SFX E6 о етшым/S2 о
SFX E6 ӧ етшым/S2 ӧ
SFX E6 й етшым/S2 й
SFX E6 ь етшым/S2 ь
SFX E6 0 етла/S4 [^аеоӧйь]
SFX E6 а етла/S4 а
SFX E6 е етла/S4 е
SFX E6 о етла/S4 о
SFX E6 ӧ етла/S4 ӧ
SFX E6 й етла/S4 й
SFX E6 ь етла/S4 ь
SFX E6 0 етшыла/S4 [^аеоӧйь]
SFX E6 а етшыла/S4 а
SFX E6 е етшыла/S4 е
SFX E6 о етшыла/S4 о
SFX E6 ӧ етшыла/S4 ӧ
SFX E6 й етшыла/S4 й
SFX E6 ь етшыла/S4 ь
SFX E6 0 етге/S5 [^аеоӧйь]
SFX E6 а етге/S5 а
SFX E6 е етге/S5 е
SFX E6 о етге/S5 о
SFX E6 ӧ етге/S5 ӧ
SFX E6 й етге/S5 й
SFX E6 ь етге/S5 ь
SFX E6 0 етшыге/S5 [^аеоӧйь]
SFX E6 а етшыге/S5 а
SFX E6 е етшыге/S5 е
SFX E6 о етшыге/S5 о
SFX E6 ӧ етшыге/S5 ӧ
SFX E6 й етшыге/S5 й
SFX E6 ь етшыге/S5 ь
SFX E6 0 ыштет/S2 [^аеоӧ]
SFX E6 а ыштет/S2 а
SFX E6 е ыштет/S2 е
SFX E6 о ыштет/S2 о
SFX E6 ӧ ыштет/S2 ӧ
SFX E6 0 тет [аы]ш
SFX E6 0 ыштетше [^аеоӧ]
SFX E6 а ыштетше а
SFX E6 е ыштетше е
SFX E6 о ыштетше о
SFX E6 ӧ ыштетше ӧ
SFX E6 0 тетше [аы]ш
SFX E6 0 ыштетшак [^аеоӧ]
SFX E6 а ыштетшак а
SFX E6 е ыштетшак е
SFX E6 о ыштетшак о
SFX E6 ӧ ыштетшак ӧ
SFX E6 0 тетшак [аы]ш
SFX E6 0 ыштетшат [^аеоӧ]
SFX E6 а ыштетшат а
SFX E6 е ыштетшат е
SFX E6 о ыштетшат о
SFX E6 ӧ ыштетшат ӧ
SFX E6 0 тетшат [аы]ш
SFX E6 0 ыштетшыс [^аеоӧ]
SFX E6 а ыштетшыс а
SFX E6 е ыштетшыс е
SFX E6 о ыштетшыс о
SFX E6 ӧ ыштетшыс ӧ
SFX E6 0 тетшыс [аы]ш
SFX E6 0 ышкет/S2 [^аеоӧ]
SFX E6 а ышкет/S2 а
SFX E6 е ышкет/S2 е
SFX E6 о ышкет/S2 о
SFX E6 ӧ ышкет/S2 ӧ
SFX E6 0 кет [аы]ш
SFX E6 0 ышкетше [^аеоӧ]
SFX E6 а ышкетше а
SFX E6 е ышкетше е
SFX E6 о ышкетше о
SFX E6 ӧ ышкетше ӧ
SFX E6 0 кетше [аы]ш
SFX E6 0 ышкетшак [^аеоӧ]
SFX E6 а ышкетшак а
SFX E6 е ышкетшак е
SFX E6 о ышкетшак о
SFX E6 ӧ ышкетшак ӧ
SFX E6 0 кетшак [аы]ш
SFX E6 0 ышкетшат [^аеоӧ]
SFX E6 а ышкетшат а
SFX E6 е ышкетшат е
SFX E6 о ышкетшат о
SFX E6 ӧ ышкетшат ӧ
SFX E6 0 кетшат [аы]ш
SFX E6 0 ышкетшыс [^аеоӧ]
SFX E6 а ышкетшыс а
SFX E6 е ышкетшыс е
SFX E6 о ышкетшыс о
SFX E6 ӧ ышкетшыс ӧ
SFX E6 0 кетшыс [аы]ш
SFX E6 0 ешет/S2 [^аеоӧйь]
SFX E6 а ешет/S2 а
SFX E6 е ешет/S2 е
SFX E6 о ешет/S2 о
SFX E6 ӧ ешет/S2 ӧ
SFX E6 й ешет/S2 й
SFX E6 ь ешет/S2 ь
SFX E6 0 ешетше [^аеоӧйь]
SFX E6 а ешетше а
SFX E6 е ешетше е
SFX E6 о ешетше о
SFX E6 ӧ ешетше ӧ
SFX E6 й ешетше й
SFX E6 ь ешетше ь
SFX E6 0 ешетшак [^аеоӧйь]
SFX E6 а ешетшак а
SFX E6 е ешетшак е
SFX E6 о ешетшак о
SFX E6 ӧ ешетшак ӧ
SFX E6 й ешетшак й
SFX E6 ь ешетшак ь
SFX E6 0 ешетшат [^аеоӧйь]
SFX E6 а ешетшат а
SFX E6 е ешетшат е
SFX E6 о ешетшат о
SFX E6 ӧ ешетшат ӧ
SFX E6 й ешетшат й
SFX E6 ь ешетшат ь
SFX E6 0 ешетшыс [^аеоӧйь]
SFX E6 а ешетшыс а
SFX E6 е ешетшыс е
SFX E6 о ешетшыс о
SFX E6 ӧ ешетшыс ӧ
SFX E6 й ешетшыс й
SFX E6 ь ешетшыс ь
SFX E6 0 етде/S5 [^аеоӧйь]
SFX E6 а етде/S5 а
SFX E6 е етде/S5 е
SFX E6 о етде/S5 о
SFX E6 ӧ етде/S5 ӧ
SFX E6 й етде/S5 й
SFX E6 ь етде/S5 ь
SFX E6 0 етшыде/S5 [^аеоӧйь]
SFX E6 а етшыде/S5 а
SFX E6 е етшыде/S5 е
SFX E6 о етшыде/S5 о
SFX E6 ӧ етшыде/S5 ӧ
SFX E6 й етшыде/S5 й
SFX E6 ь етшыде/S5 ь
SFX E6 а ыжо/O1 а
SFX E6 а ыжат/O1 а
SFX E6 а ыжак/O1 а
SFX E6 а ыжыс/O1 а
SFX E6 е ыжо/O1 е
SFX E6 е ыжат/O1 е
SFX E6 е ыжак/O1 е
SFX E6 е ыжыс/O1 е
SFX E6 о ыжо/O1 о
SFX E6 о ыжат/O1 о
SFX E6 о ыжак/O1 о
SFX E6 о ыжыс/O1 о
SFX E6 ӧ ыжо/O1 ӧ
SFX E6 ӧ ыжат/O1 ӧ
SFX E6 ӧ ыжак/O1 ӧ
SFX E6 ӧ ыжыс/O1 ӧ
SFX E6 0 ыжо/O1 ш
SFX E6 0 ыжат/O1 ш
SFX E6 0 ыжак/O1 ш
SFX E6 0 ыжыс/O1 ш
SFX E6 0 ыжо/O1 тур
SFX E6 0 ыжат/O1 тур
SFX E6 0 ыжак/O1 тур
SFX E6 0 ыжыс/O1 тур
SFX E6 0 жо/O1 [йлмнҥр]
SFX E6 0 жат/O1 [йлмнҥр]
SFX E6 0 жак/O1 [йлмнҥр]
SFX E6 0 жыс/O1 [йлмнҥр]
SFX E6 0 жо/O1 [лнр]ь
SFX E6 0 жат/O1 [лнр]ь
SFX E6 0 жак/O1 [лнр]ь
SFX E6 0 жыс/O1 [лнр]ь
SFX E6 а ыж/O1 а
SFX E6 е ыж/O1 е
SFX E6 о ыж/O1 о
SFX E6 ӧ ыж/O1 ӧ
SFX E6 0 ыж/O1 ш
SFX E6 0 жын/S2 [йлмнҥр]
SFX E6 0 жын/S2 [лнр]ь
SFX E6 а ыжын/S2 а
SFX E6 е ыжын/S2 е
SFX E6 о ыжын/S2 о
SFX E6 ӧ ыжын/S2 ӧ
SFX E6 0 ыжын/S2 ш
SFX E6 0 ыжын/S2 тур
SFX E6 0 жыным/S2 [йлмнҥр]
SFX E6 0 жыным/S2 [лнр]ь
SFX E6 а ыжыным/S2 а
SFX E6 е ыжыным/S2 е
SFX E6 о ыжыным/S2 о
SFX E6 ӧ ыжыным/S2 ӧ
SFX E6 0 ыжыным/S2 ш
SFX E6 0 ыжыным/S2 тур
SFX E6 0 жынла/S4 [йлмнҥр]
SFX E6 0 жынла/S4 [лнр]ь
SFX E6 а ыжынла/S4 а
SFX E6 е ыжынла/S4 е
SFX E6 о ыжынла/S4 о
SFX E6 ӧ ыжынла/S4 ӧ
SFX E6 0 ыжынла/S4 ш
SFX E6 0 ыжынла/S4 тур
SFX E6 0 жылан/S2 [йлмнҥр]
SFX E6 0 жылан/S2 [лнр]ь
SFX E6 а ыжлан/S2 а
SFX E6 е ыжлан/S2 е
SFX E6 о ыжлан/S2 о
SFX E6 ӧ ыжлан/S2 ӧ
SFX E6 0 ыжлан/S2 ш
SFX E6 0 ыжлан/S2 тур
SFX E6 0 жым/S2 [йлмнҥр]
SFX E6 0 жым/S2 [лнр]ь
SFX E6 а ыжым/S2 а
SFX E6 е ыжым/S2 е
SFX E6 о ыжым/S2 о
SFX E6 ӧ ыжым/S2 ӧ
SFX E6 0 ыжым/S2 ш
SFX E6 0 ыжым/S2 тур
SFX E6 0 жыла/S4 [йлмнҥр]
SFX E6 0 жыла/S4 [лнр]ь
SFX E6 а ыжла/S4 а
SFX E6 е ыжла/S4 е
SFX E6 о ыжла/S4 о
SFX E6 ӧ ыжла/S4 ӧ
SFX E6 0 ыжла/S4 ш
SFX E6 0 ыжла/S4 тур
SFX E6 0 жыге/S5 [йлмнҥр]
SFX E6 0 жыге/S5 [лнр]ь
SFX E6 а ыжге/S5 а
SFX E6 е ыжге/S5 е
SFX E6 о ыжге/S5 о
SFX E6 ӧ ыжге/S5 ӧ
SFX E6 0 ыжге/S5 ш
SFX E6 0 ыжге/S5 тур
SFX E6 0 ыштыжо [йлмнҥр]
SFX E6 0 ыштыжо [лнр]ь
SFX E6 а ыштыжо а
SFX E6 е ыштыжо е
SFX E6 о ыштыжо о
SFX E6 ӧ ыштыжо ӧ
SFX E6 0 ыштыжо ш
SFX E6 0 тыжо [аы]ш
SFX E6 0 ыштыжо тур
SFX E6 0 ышкыжо [йлмнҥр]
SFX E6 0 ышкыжо [лнр]ь
SFX E6 а ышкыжо а
SFX E6 е ышкыжо е
SFX E6 о ышкыжо о
SFX E6 ӧ ышкыжо ӧ
SFX E6 0 ышкыжо ш
SFX E6 0 кыжо [аы]ш
SFX E6 0 ышкыжо тур
SFX E6 0 ыштыжак [йлмнҥр]
SFX E6 0 ыштыжак [лнр]ь
SFX E6 а ыштыжак а
SFX E6 е ыштыжак е
SFX E6 о ыштыжак о
SFX E6 ӧ ыштыжак ӧ
SFX E6 0 ыштыжак ш
SFX E6 0 тыжак [аы]ш
SFX E6 0 ыштыжак тур
SFX E6 0 ышкыжак [йлмнҥр]
SFX E6 0 ышкыжак [лнр]ь
SFX E6 а ышкыжак а
SFX E6 е ышкыжак е
SFX E6 о ышкыжак о
SFX E6 ӧ ышкыжак ӧ
SFX E6 0 ышкыжак ш
SFX E6 0 кыжак [аы]ш
SFX E6 0 ышкыжак тур
SFX E6 0 ыштыжат [йлмнҥр]
SFX E6 0 ыштыжат [лнр]ь
SFX E6 а ыштыжат а
SFX E6 е ыштыжат е
SFX E6 о ыштыжат о
SFX E6 ӧ ыштыжат ӧ
SFX E6 0 ыштыжат ш
SFX E6 0 тыжат [аы]ш
SFX E6 0 ыштыжат тур
SFX E6 0 ышкыжат [йлмнҥр]
SFX E6 0 ышкыжат [лнр]ь
SFX E6 а ышкыжат а
SFX E6 е ышкыжат е
SFX E6 о ышкыжат о
SFX E6 ӧ ышкыжат ӧ
SFX E6 0 ышкыжат ш
SFX E6 0 кыжат [аы]ш
SFX E6 0 ышкыжат тур
SFX E6 0 ыштыжыс [йлмнҥр]
SFX E6 0 ыштыжыс [лнр]ь
SFX E6 а ыштыжыс а
SFX E6 е ыштыжыс е
SFX E6 о ыштыжыс о
SFX E6 ӧ ыштыжыс ӧ
SFX E6 0 ыштыжыс ш
SFX E6 0 тыжыс [аы]ш
SFX E6 0 ыштыжыс тур
SFX E6 0 ышкыжыс [йлмнҥр]
SFX E6 0 ышкыжыс [лнр]ь
SFX E6 а ышкыжыс а
SFX E6 е ышкыжыс е
SFX E6 о ышкыжыс о
SFX E6 ӧ ышкыжыс ӧ
SFX E6 0 ышкыжыс ш
SFX E6 0 кыжыс [аы]ш
SFX E6 0 ышкыжыс тур
SFX E6 0 ешыже/S5 [^аеоӧйь]
SFX E6 а ешыже/S5 а
SFX E6 е ешыже/S5 е
SFX E6 о ешыже/S5 о
SFX E6 ӧ ешыже/S5 ӧ
SFX E6 ы ешыже/S5 ы
SFX E6 0 жыде/S5 [йлмнҥр]
SFX E6 0 жыде/S5 [лнр]ь
SFX E6 а ыжде/S5 а
SFX E6 е ыжде/S5 е
SFX E6 о ыжде/S5 о
SFX E6 ӧ ыжде/S5 ӧ
SFX E6 0 ыжде/S5 ш
SFX E6 0 ыжде/S5 тур
SFX E6 0 шо/O1 [бвгдзжкпстфхцчщ]
SFX E6 0 шат/O1 [бвгдзжкпстфхцчщ]
SFX E6 0 шак/O1 [бвгдзжкпстфхцчщ]
SFX E6 0 шыс/O1 [бвгдзжкпстфхцчщ]
SFX E6 0 шо/O1 [^лнр]ь
SFX E6 0 шат/O1 [^лнр]ь
SFX E6 0 шак/O1 [^лнр]ь
SFX E6 0 шыс/O1 [^лнр]ь
SFX E6 0 шын/S2 [бвгдзжкпстфхцчщ]
SFX E6 0 шын/S2 [^лнр]ь
SFX E6 0 шыным/S2 [бвгдзжкпстфхцчщ]
SFX E6 0 шыным/S2 [^лнр]ь
SFX E6 0 шынла/S4 [бвгдзжкпстфхцчщ]
SFX E6 0 шынла/S4 [^лнр]ь
SFX E6 0 шылан/S2 [бвгдзжкпстфхцчщ]
SFX E6 0 шылан/S2 [^лнр]ь
SFX E6 0 шым/S2 [бвгдзжкпстфхцчщ]
SFX E6 0 шым/S2 [^лнр]ь
SFX E6 0 шыла/S4 [бвгдзжкпстфхцчщ]
SFX E6 0 шыла/S4 [^лнр]ь
SFX E6 0 шыге/S5 [бвгдзжкпстфхцчщ]
SFX E6 0 шыге/S5 [^лнр]ь
SFX E6 0 ыштыжо [бвгдзжкпстфхцчщ]
SFX E6 0 ыштыжо [^лнр]ь
SFX E6 0 ышкыжо [бвгдзжкпстфхцчщ]
SFX E6 0 ышкыжо [^лнр]ь
SFX E6 0 ыштыжак [бвгдзжкпстфхцчщ]
SFX E6 0 ыштыжак [^лнр]ь
SFX E6 0 ышкыжак [бвгдзжкпстфхцчщ]
SFX E6 0 ышкыжак [^лнр]ь
SFX E6 0 ыштыжат [бвгдзжкпстфхцчщ]
SFX E6 0 ыштыжат [^лнр]ь
SFX E6 0 ышкыжат [бвгдзжкпстфхцчщ]
SFX E6 0 ышкыжат [^лнр]ь
SFX E6 0 ыштыжыс [бвгдзжкпстфхцчщ]
SFX E6 0 ыштыжыс [^лнр]ь
SFX E6 0 ышкыжыс [бвгдзжкпстфхцчщ]
SFX E6 0 ышкыжыс [^лнр]ь
SFX E6 0 ешыже/S5 [бвгдзжкпстфхцчщ]
SFX E6 0 ешыже/S5 [^лнр]ь
SFX E6 0 шыде/S5 [бвгдзжкпстфхцчщ]
SFX E6 0 шыде/S5 [^лнр]ь
SFX E6 0 на/S4 [^аеоӧ]
SFX E6 а ына/S4 а
SFX E6 е ына/S4 е
SFX E6 о ына/S4 о
SFX E6 ӧ ына/S4 ӧ
SFX E6 0 на/O1 [^аеоӧ]
SFX E6 а ына/O1 а
SFX E6 е ына/O1 е
SFX E6 о ына/O1 о
SFX E6 ӧ ына/O1 ӧ
SFX E6 0 наже/O1 [^аеоӧ]
SFX E6 а ынаже/O1 а
SFX E6 е ынаже/O1 е
SFX E6 о ынаже/O1 о
SFX E6 ӧ ынаже/O1 ӧ
SFX E6 0 нажак/O1 [^аеоӧ]
SFX E6 а ынажак/O1 а
SFX E6 е ынажак/O1 е
SFX E6 о ынажак/O1 о
SFX E6 ӧ ынажак/O1 ӧ
SFX E6 0 нажат/O1 [^аеоӧ]
SFX E6 а ынажат/O1 а
SFX E6 е ынажат/O1 е
SFX E6 о ынажат/O1 о
SFX E6 ӧ ынажат/O1 ӧ
SFX E6 0 нажыс/O1 [^аеоӧ]
SFX E6 а ынажыс/O1 а
SFX E6 е ынажыс/O1 е
SFX E6 о ынажыс/O1 о
SFX E6 ӧ ынажыс/O1 ӧ
SFX E6 0 нан/S2 [^аеоӧ]
SFX E6 а ынан/S2 а
SFX E6 е ынан/S2 е
SFX E6 о ынан/S2 о
SFX E6 ӧ ынан/S2 ӧ
SFX E6 0 наным/S2 [^аеоӧ]
SFX E6 а ынаным/S2 а
SFX E6 е ынаным/S2 е
SFX E6 о ынаным/S2 о
SFX E6 ӧ ынаным/S2 ӧ
SFX E6 0 нанла/S4 [^аеоӧ]
SFX E6 а ынанла/S4 а
SFX E6 е ынанла/S4 е
SFX E6 о ынанла/S4 о
SFX E6 ӧ ынанла/S4 ӧ
SFX E6 0 нажын/S2 [^аеоӧ]
SFX E6 а ынажын/S2 а
SFX E6 е ынажын/S2 е
SFX E6 о ынажын/S2 о
SFX E6 ӧ ынажын/S2 ӧ
SFX E6 0 налан/S2 [^аеоӧ]
SFX E6 а ыналан/S2 а
SFX E6 е ыналан/S2 е
SFX E6 о ыналан/S2 о
SFX E6 ӧ ыналан/S2 ӧ
SFX E6 0 ланна/S4 [^аеоӧ]
SFX E6 0 ланнаже [^аеоӧ]
